src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_RUÕDDÂS !!= *  @CODE@ ruõddâs:ruõdˈdâz
! orth_gradation: no
! ped_gradation: yes
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! N_GEN2X3-NOM2X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-tuoddar__
:%^Pen%^CCC2CC%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! ruõddâs
:%^Pen%^CCC2CC%^DeVC SG-NOM ;		! ruõddâs
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	       			! ruõdˈdâs
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;		! ruõdˈdsa
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;		! ruõdˈdsest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;		! ruõdˈdsin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ; 			! ruõdˈdsen
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;			! ruõdˈdsi, 
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_NAʹZVAANÂŠ !!= *  @CODE@ naʹzvaanâš:naʹzvaanâž
+N:  NMN_NAʹZVAANÂŠ ;
LEXICON NMN_NAʹZVAANÂŠ !!= *  @CODE@ naʹzvaanâš:naʹzvaanâž
! orth_gradation: no
! ped_gradation: no
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! N_GEN2X3-NOM2X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-tuoddar__
:%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! naʹzvaanâš
:%^DeVC SG-NOM ;		! naʹzvaanâš
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	       			! naʹzvaanâž
: PL-NOM ;	       			! naʹzvaanâž
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;		! naʹzvaanša
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;		! naʹzvaanšest
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;		! naʹzvaanšin
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ; 			! naʹzvaanšen
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;			! naʹzvaanši, 
:%^RmVow%^DeVC VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_NAʹZVAANÂŠ-PL !!= *  @CODE@ naʹzvaanâš:naʹzvaanâž
+N: PL-NOM ;                              ! naʹzvaanâž
+N:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;                 ! naʹzvaanši,

LEXICON N_OOBRÂC
+N: NMN_OOBRÂC ;
LEXICON NMN_OOBRÂC
! gradation: no
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! stemtype n-stem ǩiõrâč:ǩiõrâč
!! N_GEN2X3-NOM2X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-kiorach__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ; !ǩiõrâč
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
: PL-NOM ;
:%^RmVow PL-OBL ;
:%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_CÕÕGGÂLM !!= * @CODE@ cõõggâlm:cõõggâlm
+N: NMN_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
LEXICON NMN_CÕÕGGÂLM
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Strong grade: Sg.Nom
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! stemtype l-stem cõõggâlm:cõõggâlm
!! * __@LEXNAME@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 9 (29)
!! ** Yaml: __cooggalm, aaresm, kaaddask __ 
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! cõõggâlm
: SG-NOM ;	       		! cõõggâlm
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! cõõggâlm
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;	! cõglma
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;	! cõglmest
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;	! cõglmin
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;  	! cõglmen
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow PL-OBL ;	! cõglmi, cõglmid, cõglmid, cõglmin, cõglmivuiʹm, cõglmitaa/cõglmitää
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_SIIVÂLM !!= * @CODE@ siivâlm:siivâlm
+N: NMN_SIIVÂLM ;
LEXICON NMN_SIIVÂLM
! vowel_length: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Strong grade: Sg.Nom
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! stemtype l-stem siivâlm:siivâlm
!! * __@LEXNAME@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 9 (29)
!! ** Yaml: __N-siivalm __ 
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! siivâlm
: SG-NOM ;	       		! siivâlm
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! siivâlm
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;	! sivlma
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;	! sivlmest
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;	! sivlmin
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;  	! sivlmen
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow PL-OBL ;	! sivlmi, sivlmid, sivlmid, sivlmin, sivlmivuiʹm, sivlmitaa/sivlmitää
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_KAADDÂŠǨ !!= * @CODE@ kaaddâšǩ:kaaddâšǩ
+N: NMN_KAADDÂŠǨ ;
LEXICON NMN_KAADDÂŠǨ
! gradation: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Strong grade: Sg.Nom
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! * __@LEXNAME@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 9 (29)
!! ** Yaml: __cooggalm, aaresm, kaaddask __ 
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! kaaddâšǩ
: SG-NOM ;	       		! kaaddâšǩ
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! kaaddâšǩ
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a SG-ILL ;	! kadška
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;	! kadšǩest
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;	! kadšǩin
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;  	! kadšǩen
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow PL-OBL ;	! kadšǩi, kadšǩid, kadšǩid, kadšǩin, kadšǩivuiʹm, kadšǩitaa/kadšǩitää
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%^PALNo VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns- CHECKME

LEXICON N_IILÂSǨ !!= * @CODE@ iilâsǩ:iilâsǩ
+N: NMN_IILÂSǨ ;
LEXICON NMN_IILÂSǨ
! vowel_length: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Strong grade: Sg.Nom
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! ** Yaml: __N-iilask __ 
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! iilâsǩ
: SG-NOM ;	       		! iilâsǩ
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! iilâsǩ
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a SG-ILL ;	! ilska
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;	! ilsǩest
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;	! ilsǩin
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;  	! ilsǩen
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow PL-OBL ;	! ilsǩi, ilsǩid, ilskid, ilskin, ilskivuiʹm, ilskitaa/ilskitää
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%^PALNo VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns- CHECKME

LEXICON N_VIIRRÂM !!= * @CODE@ viirrâm:viirrâm
+N: NMN_VIIRRÂM ;
LEXICON NMN_VIIRRÂM
! vowel_length: yes
!   Extra strong grade: Else
!   Strong grade: Sg.Nom
! Penultimate stem vowel loss: Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Ess, Par, Pl.Obl
! Stem vowel: e
!! stemtype l-stem viirrâm:viirrâm
!! * __@LEXNAME@__ = Koulukielioppi stemtype II 9 (29)
!! ** Yaml: __N-viirram __ 
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! viirrâm
: SG-NOM ;	       		! viirrâm
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! viirrâm
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;	! viirrma
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;	! viirrmest
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;	! viirrmin
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;  	! viirrmen
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow PL-OBL ;	! viirrmi, viirrmid, viirrmid, viirrmin, viirrmivuiʹm, viirrmitaa/viirrmitää
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VÕÕNÂS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

!! CLASS 4 BISYLLABIC, LOW VOWEL, MONOPHTHONG, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON N_CEERKAV !!= * @CODE@ ceerkav:cẹẹrkav
+N: NMN_CEERKAV ;
LEXICON NMN_CEERKAV !!= * @CODE@ ceerkav:cẹẹrkav
! gradation: yes
! "1.2"
!! = stemtype n-stem ceerkav:ceerkav
!! ** Yaml: __ceerkav__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) ceerkav
: SG-NOM ;	       			!!= * @CODE@ (1) ceerkav
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;				!!= * @CODE@ (2) ceerkav
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) ceerkva
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;		  	   !!= * @CODE@ (4) ceerkvest
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;			   !!= * @CODE@ (5) ceerkvin
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;  			   !!= * @CODE@ (6) ceerkven
:%^RmVow SÅÅBBAR-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ såbbr-
!+Use/NG:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^XY2XYY%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;  (3) cerkkva

LEXICON N_SÅÅBBAR !!= * @CODE@ sååbbar:s%^1VOWåbbar
+N: NMN_SÅÅBBAR ;
LEXICON NMN_SÅÅBBAR !!= * @CODE@ sååbbar:s%^1VOWåbbar
! gradation: yes
!! N_GEN2X3-NOM2X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-sååbbar__
:%^Pen%^V2VV ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		! sååbbar
:%^Pen%^V2VV SG-NOM ;	       			! sååbbar
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! såbbar
:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^RmVow PL-OBL ;
:%^RmVow SÅÅBBAR-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ såbbr-

LEXICON N_KÅÅDDAS !!= * @CODE@ kååddas:kåddaz
+N: NMN_KÅÅDDAS ;
LEXICON NMN_KÅÅDDAS !!= * @CODE@ kååddas:kåddaz
! gradation: yes
!! N_GEN2X3-NOM2X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-kååddas__
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^DeVC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		! kååddas
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^DeVC SG-NOM ;	       			! kååddas
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;			! kåddaz
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%^DeVC%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
+Use/NG:%^RmVow%>e PAR ;
:%^RmVow%^DeVC PL-OBL ;
:%^RmVow%^DeVC SÅÅBBAR-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ kådds-

LEXICON N_KÅÅLVAK !!= * @CODE@ kåålvak:kåålvak
+N: NMN_KÅÅLVAK ;
