src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
aassâmkääđas:aassâm#kä%^1VOWttaz N_KÅÅDDAS ;
allergsiivâlm:allerg#siivâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
budjeʹttsmiõttâm:budjeʹtt#smiõttâm N_OOBRÂC ;
ceerkavsååbbar:ceerkav#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
ceertâlm:cẹẹrtâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
cenn-njuhččâm:cenn-njuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
cõõjjâm:cõõjjâm N_OOBRÂC ;
duõmmceerkav:duõmm#cẹẹrkav N_CEERKAV ;
duõmmišttâm:duõmmišttâm N_OOBRÂC ;
heeđâlm:heeđâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
hoolâr:hoolâr N_OOBRÂC ;
hääʹrav:hääʹrav N_CEERKAV ;
jaaʹmmipoorrâm:jaaʹmmipoorrâm N_OOBRÂC ;
jeännav:jeännav N_CEERKAV ;
jeäʹǩǩespoorrâm:jeäʹǩǩes#poorrâm N_OOBRÂC ;
jiõŋŋsaakkânj:jiõŋŋ#saakkânj N_OOBRÂC ;
joorrâm:joorrâm N_OOBRÂC ;
juuǥǥâlm:juuǥǥâlm N_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
jännav:jännav N_CEERKAV ;
jäuʹrrnirrâm:jäuʹrrnirrâm N_OOBRÂC ;
kaarâlm:kaarâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
kaʹlli-iilâsǩ:kaʹlli-iilâsǩ N_IILÂSǨ ;
keäʹpperkäirrav:keäʹpper#käirrav N_CEERKAV ;
koččât:koččât N_OOBRÂC ;
koškkâm:koškkâm N_OOBRÂC ;
koǯǯâm:koǯǯâm N_OOBRÂC ;
kulttuurpreeddan:kulttuurpre%^1VOWddan N_SÅÅBBAR ;
kuʹvddnjuhččâm:kuʹvddnjuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
kärldõk-kaarât:kärldõk-kaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
käʹrrav:käʹrrav N_CEERKAV ;
kåʹlccsaakkânj:kåʹlcc#saakkânj N_OOBRÂC ;
laauǥkaarât:laauǥkaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
lauggâmkaarât:lauggâmkaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
leʹšǩǩsiivâlm:leʹšǩǩsiivâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
liâdggsaakkânj:liâdgg#saakkânj N_OOBRÂC ;
louddâm:louddâm N_OOBRÂC ;
lääiʹjčõõnâlm:lääiʹjčõõnâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
lääʹppvuõnjâč:lääʹpp#vuõnjâč N_OOBRÂC ;
låʹǩǩ-kaarât:låʹǩǩ-kaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
markkân:markkân N_OOBRÂC ;
mašinahääʹrav:mašinahääʹrav N_CEERKAV ;
mekanikkâr:mekanikkâr N_OOBRÂC ;
miõtt-talkkân:miõtt-talkkân N_OOBRÂC ;
moorâč:moorâč N_OOBRÂC ;
muäʹlǩǩnjuhččâm:muäʹlǩǩnjuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
muõrrsaavjemsaakkânj:muõrr#saavjem#saakkânj N_OOBRÂC ;
mäddmetteemteknikkâr:mädd#metteem#teknikkâr N_OOBRÂC ;
mäʹtǩǩjaakân:mäʹtǩǩjaakân N_OOBRÂC ;
neuʹllpooddâšǩ:neuʹllpooddâšǩ N_KAADDÂŠǨ ;
njeʹšǩǩnueʹrrčouggâm:njeʹšǩǩnueʹrrčouggâm N_OOBRÂC ;
njõõđâlm:njõõđâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
noorõõttâmsååbbar:noorõõttâm#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
ooldâm:ooldâm N_OOBRÂC ;
ooǥlâm:ooǥlâm N_OOBRÂC ;
optikkâr:optikkâr N_OOBRÂC ;
pakkâznoorrâm:pakkâznoorrâm N_OOBRÂC ;
pessčouggâm:pessčouggâm N_OOBRÂC ;
peäʹlǧǧčooǥǥâlm:peäʹlǧǧčooǥǥâlm N_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
peäʹsskaarât:peäʹsˈskaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
peʹlljkaappâst:peʹlljkaappâst N_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
piõjjân:piõjjân N_OOBRÂC ;
pombbâltikkâr:pombbâltikkâr N_OOBRÂC ;
potretsuurâm:potretsuurâm N_OOBRÂC ;
puäʒʒooccâm:puäʒʒooccâm N_OOBRÂC ;
puåtkčõõttâm:puåtkčõõttâm N_OOBRÂC ;
pååddal:på%^1VOWddal N_SÅÅBBAR ;
põzldõk-kaarât:põzldõk-kaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
põškkikkân:põškkikkân N_OOBRÂC ;
raajâlm:raajâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
ruâpttsõhssâm:ruâpttsõhssâm N_OOBRÂC ;
rååssal:rå%^1VOWssal N_SÅÅBBAR ;
sauʒʒpoortemkaarât:sauʒʒpoortemkaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
siivâlm:siivâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
sizzpiâssâm:sizzpiâssâm N_OOBRÂC ;
staamâlm:staamâlm N_SIIVÂLM ;
sueiʹmkâr:sueiʹmkâr N_OOBRÂC ;
suudâr:suudâr N_OOBRÂC ;
takaisååbbar:takai#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
tattarsuurâm:tattarsuurâm N_OOBRÂC ;
teâttikkân:teâttikkân N_OOBRÂC ;
tieʹppriõssâm:tieʹpˈpriõssâm N_OOBRÂC ;
tiuddsååbbar:tiudd#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
tollnjuhččâm:tollnjuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
tuâjjmarkkân:tuâjjmarkkân N_OOBRÂC ;
tuåimtemsååbbar:tuåimtem#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
täkk-kaarât:täkk-kaarât N_OOBRÂC ;
uukkâm:uukkâm N_OOBRÂC ;
uvjjpooddâšǩ:uvjjpooddâšǩ N_KAADDÂŠǨ ;
vaccčooǥǥâlm:vaccčooǥǥâlm N_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
valdiasååbbar:valdia#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
veeccat:ve%^1VOWccat N_SÅÅBBAR ;
veättak:veättak N_KÅÅLVAK ;
viirrâm:viirrâm N_VIIRRÂM ;
viissâr:viissâr N_OOBRÂC ;
viõttâr:viõttâr N_OOBRÂC ;
viʹsǩǩesloobbâsǩ:viʹsǩǩesloobbâsǩ N_KAADDÂŠǨ ;
voolâst:voolâst N_SIIVÂLM ;
võõnâsnaappâlm:võõnâsnaappâlm N_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
äkkav:äkkav N_CEERKAV ;
ääddar:ä%^1VOWddar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
ååʹves-suurâm:ååʹves-suurâm N_OOBRÂC ;
čooddkuåǥǥâm:čoodd#kuåǥǥâm N_OOBRÂC ;
čueiʹvak:čueiʹvak N_KÅÅLVAK ;
čuõjjân:čuõjjân N_OOBRÂC ;
čâʹlmmoollâm:čâʹlmmoollâm N_OOBRÂC ;
čõhččooccâm:čõhččooccâm N_OOBRÂC ;
čõhččsååbbar:čõhčč#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
škooppâšǩ:škooppâšǩ N_KAADDÂŠǨ ;
ǩeâllnjuhččâm:ǩeâlˈlnjuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
ǩeʹddiilâsǩ:ǩeʹddiilâsǩ N_IILÂSǨ ;
ǩiiddâlm:ǩiiddâlm N_CÕÕGGÂLM ;
ǩiâppnjuhččâm:ǩiâppnjuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
ǩiõǥǥnjuhččâm:ǩiõǥǥnjuhččâm N_OOBRÂC ;
ǩiđđsååbbar:ǩiđđ#så%^1VOWbbar N_SÅÅBBAR ;
